South Dakota, session 2026, HB1048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $87,000,000 in federal fund expenditure authority, to the
Governor's Office of Economic Development, for providing grants to expand broadband
infrastructure in this state, in accordance with the federal guidelines as part of the Broadband
Equity, Access, and Deployment program.
Section 2. The commissioner of the Governor's Office of Economic Development shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized
in this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.566.20 2 1048
An Act to make an appropriation for the expansion of broadband infrastructure and to declare
an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1048
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1048 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1048 ENROLLED